Utah statutes.
55-12-112.   Article 12 -- Severability and construction.
(1)  The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision is considered unenforceable, the remaining
provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.
(2)  The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate
its purposes.
